Missouri, session 2026, SB941.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.050, 313.205, 313.230, 313.820,
572.010, 572.015, and 572.100, RSMo, are repealed and seventeen
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
27.180, 43.050, 313.205, 313.230, 313.425, 313.427, 313.429,
313.431, 313.433, 313.434, 313.435, 313.437, 313.820, 572.010,
572.015, 572.100, and 650.930, to read as follows:
27.180. There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Illegal Gaming Enforcement Fund", which shall consist
of revenues received by the state lottery commission
pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection 3 of section
313.429 or other funds so appropriated. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. Moneys in the fund shall be used by the
attorney general, prosecutors, and law enforcement to
investigate, enforce, charge, and prosecute violations of
chapter 572. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at
the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 941 2
the general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.
43.050. 1. The superintendent may appoint not more
than thirty-four captains and one director of radio, each of
whom shall have the same qualifications as the
superintendent, nor more than sixty-eight lieutenants, and
such additional force of sergeants, corporals and patrolmen,
so that the total number of members of the patrol shall not
exceed one thousand sixty-four officers and patrolmen and
such numbers of radio personnel as the superintendent deems
necessary.
2. In case of a national emergency the superintendent
may name additional patrolmen and radio personnel in a
number sufficient to replace, temporarily, patrolmen and
radio personnel called into military services.
3. The superintendent may enter into an agreement with
the Missouri lottery commission and the Missouri gaming
commission to enforce any law, rule, or regulation, conduct
background investigations under the laws of this state, and
enforce the regulations of licensed gaming activities
governed by chapter 313. A notice of either party to
terminate or modify the provisions of such agreement shall
be in writing and executed not less than one year from the
effective date of the termination or modification, unless
mutually agreed upon by the superintendent [and], the
Missouri lottery commission, or the Missouri gaming
commission. Members of the patrol hired in conjunction with
any agreement with the Missouri lottery commission or the
Missouri gaming commission shall not be subject to the
personnel cap referenced in subsection 1 of this section.

SB 941 3
If such agreement is subsequently terminated or modified to
reduce the number of personnel used in such agreement, those
members affected by such termination or modification shall
not be subject to the personnel cap referenced in subsection
1 of this section for a period of five years.
4. Member positions of the patrol originally acquired
in conjunction with the community-oriented policing services
federal grant or members assigned to fulfill the duties
established in sections 43.350 to 43.380 shall not be
subject to the personnel cap referenced in subsection 1 of
this section.
5. Applicants shall not be discriminated against
because of race, creed, color, national origin or sex.
313.205. As used in sections 313.200 to 313.350, the
following words and terms shall have the meanings ascribed
to them in this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Commission" or "lottery commission", the three-
member body appointed by the governor to manage and oversee
the lottery and to appoint a director;
(2) "Commissioner", one of the members of the lottery
commission appointed by the governor pursuant to the
provisions of sections 313.200 to 313.350;
(3) "Director", the director of the state lottery
appointed by the commission as the chief administrator of
the state lottery;
(4) "Division", the division of the state lottery
authorized by sections 313.200 to 313.350;
(5) "Lottery" or "state lottery", the state lottery
established and operated pursuant to the provisions of
sections 313.200 to 313.350;

SB 941 4
(6) "Lottery contractor" or "lottery vendor", a person
with whom the division has contracted to provide goods or
services for the state lottery;
(7) "Lottery game" or "game", any procedure authorized
by written rule of the commission or by law whereby prizes
are distributed among persons who have paid, or have
unconditionally agreed to pay, for tickets or shares in
either a physical or electronic format which provide the
opportunity to win such prizes;
(8) "Lottery game retailer", any person with whom the
lottery commission has contracted to sell tickets or shares
in lottery games to the public;
(9) "Lottery ticket" or "shares", any bearer
instrument in a physical form or in an electronic format
authorized by the commission. A bearer instrument may
include credits that can be redeemed for use in playing
future lottery games;
(10) "Person", any natural person, firm, corporation,
or other legal entity possessing a department of revenue
retail sales license, as provided by law.
313.230. The commission shall:
(1) Issue rules and regulations concerning the
operation of the Missouri state lottery. The rules and
regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted, except no
lottery may use any coin- or token-operated amusement device
[and no]. Lottery [game shall] games may be based [in any
form] on the outcome of sporting events where the maximum
ticket price does not exceed five dollars per ticket.
[However,] It shall be legal to use clerk- or player-
activated terminals or kiosks[, which are coin- or currency-

SB 941 5
operated,] to [dispense] sell lottery tickets. The
commission may also use an internet application to sell
electronic scratcher games, draw games, and pull-tab games
where a player may access such internet application to buy
lottery tickets in an electronic format using a personal
device;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the
lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning
tickets or shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or
shares;
(e) The manner of payment of prizes to the holders of
winning tickets or shares;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of
winning tickets or shares, without limitation;
(g) The types or numbers of locations at which tickets
or shares may be sold and the method to be used in selling
tickets or shares;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;
(i) The licensing of lottery game retailers to sell
tickets or shares;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, including
commissions, ticket discounts, incentives and any other
remuneration, to be paid to or retained by lottery game
retailers;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing
from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from all
other sources among:
a. The payment of prizes to the holders of winning
tickets or shares;

SB 941 6
b. The payment of costs incurred in the operation and
administration of the lottery, including the expenses of the
commission and the costs resulting from any contract or
contracts entered into for promotional, advertising or
operational services or for the purchase or lease of lottery
equipment and materials;
c. For the repayment to the general revenue fund of
any amount appropriated for initial start-up of the lottery;
and
d. For timely transfer to the state lottery fund as
provided by law;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the
efficient and economical operation and administration of the
lottery and for the convenience of the purchasers of tickets
or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares. The
commission may disburse money for payment of lottery prizes;
(2) Amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules and
regulations from time to time as it deems necessary or
desirable;
(3) Advise and make recommendations to the director
regarding the operation and administration of the lottery;
(4) Report quarterly to the governor and the general
assembly the total lottery revenues, prize disbursements and
other expenses for the preceding quarter, and to make an
annual report, which shall include a full and complete
statement of lottery revenues, prize disbursements and other
expenses, to the governor and the general assembly, and
including such recommendations for changes in sections
313.200 to 313.350 as it deems necessary or desirable;
(5) Report to the governor and general assembly any
matters which shall require immediate changes in the laws of
this state in order to prevent abuses and evasions of

SB 941 7
sections 313.200 to 313.350 or rules and regulations
promulgated thereunder or to rectify undesirable conditions
in connection with the administration or operation of the
lottery;
(6) Carry on a continuous study and investigation of
the lottery throughout the state and to make a continuous
study and investigation of the operation and the
administration of similar laws which may be in effect in
other states or countries, any literature on the subject
which from time to time may be published or available, any
federal laws which may affect the operation of the lottery,
and the reaction of Missouri citizens to existing and
potential features of the lottery with a view to
recommending or effecting changes that will tend to serve
the purposes of sections 313.200 to 313.350;
(7) Ensure that all employees of the state lottery
commission hired after July 12, 1990, shall not be related
to any member of the state lottery commission or any
employee of the state lottery commission within the third
degree of consanguinity or affinity.
313.425. Sections 313.425 to 313.437 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Honoring Missouri Veterans and
Supporting Missouri Education Act" and shall provide
additional funding for Missouri education programs and the
Missouri veterans commission and provide additional
resources for Missouri municipalities and counties by
establishing a licensing and regulatory framework for a
system of video lottery game terminals to conduct lottery
games.
313.427. As used in sections 313.425 to 313.437, the
following terms shall mean:

SB 941 8
(1) "Adjusted gross gaming revenue", the amount of
revenue generated by a video lottery game terminal that is
remaining after:
(a) Payments of winning to players; and
(b) Deduction by the commission of that amount
necessary to pay direct administrative costs for the
operation of the centralized computer system, but before
deduction of the adjusted gross gaming revenue tax;
(2) "Adjusted gross gaming revenue tax", a tax of
thirty-four percent imposed on adjusted gross gaming revenue;
(3) "Centralized computer system", a computerized
system developed or procured by the commission that video
lottery game terminals are connected to using standard
industry protocols that can activate or deactivate a
particular video lottery game terminal from a remote
location and that is capable of monitoring and auditing
video lottery game plays;
(4) "Commission" or "lottery commission", the state
lottery commission appointed by the governor to manage and
oversee the lottery under section 313.215;
(5) "Net terminal income", the amount of adjusted
gross gaming revenue remaining after deduction of the tax
imposed by the commission under section 313.429;
(6) "Use agreement", a contract executed by and
between a video lottery terminal operator and a video
lottery terminal retailer approved by the commission
containing minimum terms and conditions determined by the
commission establishing the right of the video lottery
terminal operator to place and operate video lottery
terminals on the premises of a video lottery terminal
retailer;

SB 941 9
(7) "Video lottery game", any game approved by the
commission for play on an approved video lottery game
terminal;
(8) "Video lottery game adjusted gross receipts", the
total of cash or cash equivalents, before the deduction of
the tax imposed under section 313.429, used to play a video
lottery game on a video lottery game terminal. "Video
lottery game adjusted gross receipts" shall not include cash
or cash equivalents paid to players of video lottery games
on a video lottery game terminal or the amounts deducted by
the commission of funds necessary to pay direct
administrative costs for the operation of the centralized
computer system;
(9) "Video lottery game handler", a person who is
licensed by the commission and employed by a video lottery
game operator to handle, place, operate, and service video
lottery game terminals and associated equipment;
(10) "Video lottery game manufacturer" or
"distributor", any person licensed by the commission who:
(a) Manufactures video lottery games, video lottery
game terminals, or major parts and components for video
lottery game terminals as approved by the commission for
sale to video lottery game operators; or
(b) Distributes or services video lottery games, video
lottery game terminals, or major parts and components of
video lottery game terminals, including buying, selling,
leasing, renting, or financing new, used, or refurbished
video lottery game terminals to and from licensed video
lottery game manufacturers and licensed video lottery game
operators;
(11) "Video lottery game operator", a person who is
licensed by the commission and owns, rents, or leases and

SB 941 10
services or maintains video lottery game terminals for
placement in licensed video lottery game retailer
establishments;
(12) "Video lottery game retailer", a retail
establishment that is licensed by the commission to enter
into agreements with video lottery game operators for the
placement of video lottery game terminals and meets the
requirements of a lottery game retailer under section
313.260. No establishment with a primary purpose of
providing entertainment, activities, or educational services
to anyone under the age of eighteen shall be licensed as a
video lottery game retailer;
(13) "Video lottery game terminal or electronic gaming
machine", any device that through an electronic, mechanical,
or electromechanical process, including through the use of
any application, software, or other system that accepts
legal tender or other forms of digital currency to play, and
through which is used to generate a prize of money or form
of credit that can be redeemed for money or another form of
monetary payment that is presented to the user by a set or
combination of alphanumeric symbols or lines of symbols that
determine the amount of the prize, regardless of the
operating system that determined the prize. Electronic
gaming machines, with the exception of those operated under
section 313.800, shall be regulated by the Missouri lottery
commission. All other forms of electronic gaming machines
that are not regulated by the commission or bear the
commission's seal are not legal under the definition of a
slot machine in section 572.010;
(14) "Video lottery game terminal credit", credits
either purchased or won on a video lottery game terminal

SB 941 11
that may be used to play video lottery games or be converted
into a video lottery game ticket;
(15) "Video lottery game ticket" or "ticket", a
100 document printed at the conclusion of any video lottery game
101 play or group of plays that is redeemable for cash,
102 utilizing a video lottery game ticket redemption terminal,
103 or that may be reinserted into a video lottery game terminal
104 located in the video lottery game retailer from which such
105 ticket was issued for video lottery game terminal credit;
106 (16) "Video lottery game ticket redemption terminal",
107 the collective hardware, software, communications
108 technology, and other ancillary equipment used to facilitate
109 the payment of tickets cashed out by players as a result of
110 playing a video lottery game terminal.
313.429. 1. (1) The commission shall implement a
system of video lottery game terminals and issue licenses to
video lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game
distributors, video lottery game operators, video lottery
game handlers, and video lottery game retailers; provided,
however, that no person licensed as a:
(a) Video lottery game manufacturer or a video lottery
game distributor shall be issued a license as a video
lottery game operator or a video lottery game retailer;
(b) Video lottery game operator shall be issued a
license as a video lottery game manufacturer, a video
lottery game distributor, or a video lottery game retailer;
and
(c) Video lottery game retailer shall be issued a
license as a video lottery game manufacturer, a video
lottery game distributor, or a video lottery game operator.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a video
lottery game manufacturer from obtaining a video lottery

SB 941 12
game manufacturer's license and a video lottery game
distributor's license and providing and operating the
centralized computer system for monitoring video lottery
game terminals.
(3) The commission shall not authorize or allow a
single vendor licensee to implement the system of video
lottery game terminals. A vendor that provides the
centralized computer system shall not be eligible to be
licensed as a video lottery game operator or video lottery
game retailer.
(4) The commission shall ensure that the video lottery
game system authorized by sections 313.425 to 313.437 shall
allow for multiple video lottery game manufacturers, video
lottery game distributors, and video lottery game operators
to encourage private sector investment and job opportunities
for Missouri citizens.
2. Video lottery game terminals and video lottery
games shall meet independent testing standards approved by
the commission, as tested by one or more licensed
independent test labs. The commission shall promulgate
rules for minimum standards for video lottery game terminals
operating in the state. Such minimum standards shall
include:
(1) Video lottery game terminals shall conform to all
requirements of federal law and regulations, including FCC
Class A Emission Standards;
(2) Video lottery game terminals and video lottery
games shall theoretically pay out a mathematically
demonstrable percentage during the expected lifetime of the
machine of all amounts played, which shall not be less than
eighty percent. The commission shall establish a maximum
payout percentage for approved models by rule. Video

SB 941 13
lottery game terminals that may be affected by skill shall
meet this standard when using a method of play that will
provide the greatest return to the player over a period of
continuous play;
(3) Video lottery game terminals shall use a random
number generator computer, software, or similar random
selection process to generate and produce an independent and
random outcome of each play of a lottery game. The random
selection process shall meet ninety-nine percent confidence
limits using a standard chi-squared test for goodness of fit;
(4) Video lottery game terminals shall display an
accurate representation of the game outcome;
(5) Video lottery game terminals shall not
automatically alter pay tables or any function of the video
lottery game terminal based on internal computation of hold
percentage or have any means of manipulation that affects
the random selection process or probabilities of winning a
game;
(6) Video lottery game terminals shall not be
adversely affected by static discharge or other
electromagnetic interference;
(7) Video lottery game terminals shall, while in an
idle state or on demand, be capable of detecting and
displaying "power reset", "door open", and "door just
closed";
(8) Video lottery game terminals shall have the
capacity to display complete play history including, but not
limited to, outcome, intermediate play steps, credits
available, bets placed, credits paid, and credits cashed
out, for the most recent game played and ten games played
immediately prior thereto;

SB 941 14
(9) The theoretical payback percentage of a video
lottery game terminal shall not be capable of being changed
without making a hardware or software change in the video
lottery game terminal, either onsite or through the central
computer system;
(10) Video lottery game terminals shall be designed so
that replacement of parts or modules required for normal
maintenance does not necessitate replacement of the
electromechanical meters;
(11) Video lottery game terminals shall have one or
more mechanisms that accept cash in the form of bills. The
mechanisms shall be designed to prevent obtaining credits
without paying by stringing, slamming, drilling, or other
means. If such attempts at physical tampering are made, the
video lottery game terminal shall suspend itself from
operating until reset;
(12) Video lottery game terminals shall have
accounting software that keeps an electronic record of
100 information including, but not limited to, total cash
101 inserted, value of winning tickets claimed by players, total
102 credits played, total credits awarded by a video lottery
103 game terminal, and payback percentage credited to players of
104 each video lottery game;
105 (13) Video lottery game terminals shall be capable of
106 issuing and accepting tickets for play, commonly known as
107 ticket-in, ticket-out. Video lottery game terminals shall
108 not directly dispense anything of value except for tickets
109 representing credits purchased or won on a video lottery
110 game terminal. The ticket shall indicate the total amount
111 of award, the time of day in a twenty-four-hour format
112 showing hours and minutes, the date, the video lottery game
113 terminal serial number, the sequential number of the ticket,

SB 941 15
114 and an encrypted validation number from which the validity
115 of the prize may be determined; and
116 (14) Video lottery game terminals and redemption
117 terminals shall be connected to a centralized computer
118 system developed or procured by the commission. The
119 commission shall provide licensed video lottery game
120 operators with the necessary protocols to connect video
121 lottery game terminals to the centralized computer system
122 after such terminals have been approved by the commission.
123 No video lottery game terminal shall be placed in operation
124 without first connecting to the centralized computer system.
125 3. (1) The commission may impose an initial
126 nonrefundable administrative license application fee that
127 shall be submitted when the application is filed and
128 deposited in the state lottery fund as follows:
129 (a) For video lottery game manufacturers and video
130 lottery game distributors, twenty-five thousand dollars;
131 (b) For video lottery game operators, fifty thousand
132 dollars;
133 (c) For video lottery game retailer establishments,
134 one thousand dollars for each video lottery game retailer's
135 establishment; and
136 (d) For video lottery game handlers, one hundred
137 dollars.
138 (2) The initial license shall be for a period of one
139 year. Thereafter, license renewal periods shall be four
140 years with the applicable renewal fee paid in advance for
141 each year of such license renewal. Annual license renewal
142 fees for anyone licensed pursuant to this subsection, and
143 subsequent to the initial one-year period, shall be as
144 follows:

SB 941 16
145 (a) Five thousand dollars for video lottery game
146 manufacturers and video lottery game distributors;
147 (b) Fifty thousand dollars for video lottery game
148 operators;
149 (c) One hundred dollars for video lottery game
150 handlers; and
151 (d) One thousand dollars for each video lottery game
152 retailer's establishment.
153 (3) In addition to any other fees imposed by sections
154 313.425 to 313.437, an annual administrative fee of one
155 thousand dollars shall be paid for each video lottery game
156 terminal placed in service, and shall be deemed an
157 administrative fee on the device itself and not on the
158 operation or play thereof. Such annual administrative fee
159 shall be equally divided and paid by the video lottery game
160 operator and the video lottery game retailer to the
161 commission once a year. The commission shall deposit two
162 hundred dollars of the fee in the state lottery fund. The
163 remaining eight hundred dollars of such fee shall not be
164 considered state revenues and shall be paid as follows:
165 (a) One hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
166 Missouri state highway patrol for use in investigations and
167 enforcement of sections 313.425 to 313.437;
168 (b) One hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
169 Missouri attorney general's office for use in illegal
170 gambling enforcement;
171 (c) Four hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
172 veterans' commission; and
173 (d) Two hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the
174 municipality in which the video lottery game terminal is
175 located, except that if a video lottery game terminal is
176 located in an unincorporated area of a county, the two

SB 941 17
177 hundred dollars shall be transmitted to the county in which
178 the video lottery game terminal is located.
179 (4) No license shall be issued to any person who has
180 been convicted of a felony or any crime involving illegal
181 gambling.
182 (5) A licensee shall notify the commission of any
183 change relating to the status of its license or any other
184 information contained in the application materials on file
185 with the commission.
186 4. Licensed video lottery game operators and licensed
187 video lottery game retailers shall enter into a use
188 agreement for the placement of video lottery game
189 terminals. The video lottery game terminal operator shall
190 provide a true and accurate copy of the executed use
191 agreement to the video lottery game terminal retailer within
192 ten days after the agreement by the parties. The agreement
193 shall be on a form prepared and provided by the commission.
194 The form shall contain commercially reasonable terms
195 including, but not limited to:
196 (1) An equal division of net terminal income between a
197 video lottery game operator and video lottery game retailer;
198 (2) A requirement that the video lottery game terminal
199 operator is to be responsible for collection, remittance,
200 and disbursement of gross gaming revenue tax and net
201 terminal revenue;
202 (3) An affirmative statement that no inducement was
203 offered or accepted regarding the placement or operation of
204 video lottery game terminals at the video lottery game
205 terminal retailer's location;
206 (4) An indemnity and hold harmless provision on behalf
207 of the state, the commission, and its agents relative to any

SB 941 18
208 cause of action arising out of the agreement between a video
209 lottery game operator and a video lottery game retailer;
210 (5) A prohibition on the assignment of the agreement
211 from or to any person except from a video lottery game
212 terminal operator to another video lottery game terminal
213 operator or from a video lottery game retailer to another
214 video lottery game retailer;
215 (6) A release of the video lottery game terminal
216 retailer from any continuing contractual obligation to the
217 video lottery game terminal operator if the video lottery
218 game terminal operator has its license revoked or denied,
219 has its renewal denied, or surrenders its license;
220 (7) A provision that the parties agree to modify the
221 agreement to the extent necessary to comply with a change in
222 Missouri law or commission rules; and
223 (8) Provisions approved by the commission.
224 5. No video game lottery retailer shall enter into an
225 use agreement with more than one video lottery game operator
226 at any time. Only upon termination of a use agreement with
227 a video lottery game operator may a video lottery game
228 retailer enter into a new use agreement with a different
229 video lottery game operator.
230 6. All licensees shall remain subject to all income
231 taxes, sales taxes, and use taxes lawfully assessed by this
232 state, or any municipality, county, or other political
233 subdivision of this state; provided, however, that a
234 municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this
235 state shall not impose, levy, collect, or assess any license
236 requirement, tax, or fee including, but not limited to, any
237 permit tax or fee, sticker fee, occupation tax or fee,
238 amusement tax or fee, or taxes or fees upon the play, use,
239 ownership, lease, placement, operation, repair, service,

SB 941 19
240 transportation, or storage of any video lottery game
241 terminal, video lottery game, video lottery game terminal
242 manufacturer, video lottery game terminal distributor, video
243 lottery game terminal operator, or video lottery game
244 terminal retailer.
245 7. (1) Video lottery game terminals shall be
246 inspected and approved by the commission prior to being
247 sold, leased, or transferred.
248 (2) Licensed video lottery game manufacturers may buy,
249 sell, or lease new or refurbished video lottery game
250 terminals to and from licensed video lottery game
251 distributors and video gaming operators.
252 (3) Licensed video lottery game distributors may buy,
253 sell, or lease new or refurbished video lottery game
254 terminals to or from licensed video lottery game
255 manufacturers or licensed video lottery game operators.
256 (4) Video lottery game ticket redemption terminals
257 shall meet independent testing standards approved by the
258 commission. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
259 the contrary, any video lottery game operator that owns or
260 leases video lottery ticket redemption terminals prior to
261 the operational date established in subdivision (6) of
262 subsection 1 of section 313.431 may use or sell such video
263 lottery ticket redemption terminals pursuant to the terms of
264 sections 313.425 to 313.437. The commission shall approve
265 for use and sale any ticket redemption terminal that is in
266 operation and meets the requirements of sections 313.425 to
267 313.437, or that has been approved by another state for
268 operation for use as part of that state's video lottery game
269 system.
270 8. (1) Licensed video lottery game operators:

SB 941 20
271 (a) May buy, lease, or rent video lottery game
272 terminals from licensed video lottery game manufacturers or
273 distributors;
274 (b) May handle, place, and service video lottery game
275 terminals; and
276 (c) Shall connect such video lottery game terminals to
277 the centralized computer system approved by the commission.
278 (2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the
279 contrary, all video lottery game tickets shall be redeemed
280 using a video lottery game ticket redemption terminal. Such
281 video lottery game ticket redemption terminal shall be
282 located within a video lottery game retailer's establishment
283 in direct proximity to such video lottery game terminals.
284 Video lottery game operators shall pay the commission thirty-
285 two percent of any unclaimed cash prize associated with each
286 video lottery game ticket that has not been redeemed within
287 one hundred eighty days of issue.
288 (3) A video lottery game terminal operator shall not
289 be, directly or indirectly, a landlord or lessor of real
290 property to a video lottery game retailer. No lease of real
291 property may contain a provision requiring any sharing or
292 splitting of net terminal income, or any method of rent
293 calculation using a percentage of net terminal income, or
294 any other similar provision or method for the determination
295 or calculation of any rent concession, or other charge by a
296 lessor to a lessee.
297 (4) (a) Only a video lottery game operator or an
298 operator's employee may negotiate and enter into a use
299 agreement with a video lottery game retailer for the initial
300 or continued placement of video lottery game terminals.
301 Such agreement shall be on a form approved by the
302 commission. Video lottery game operators and video lottery

SB 941 21
303 game retailers shall not offer anything of value, other than
304 the percentage of adjusted gross receipts provided under
305 this subsection, as part of any agreement or contract.
306 (b) No video lottery game operator or video lottery
307 game retailer shall pay compensation or any other valuable
308 consideration to any third party for the solicitation,
309 procurement, execution, or delivery of any contract or
310 agreement with a video lottery game operator or video
311 lottery game retailer, except as approved by the commission.
312 (5) Agreements for the initial or continued placement
313 of video lottery game terminals entered into prior to the
314 start date established under section 313.431 between a
315 prospective video lottery game operator and a prospective
316 video lottery game retailer shall be invalid.
317 9. (1) To combat problem gambling, video lottery game
318 operators shall allow players to be self-excluded from video
319 lottery game play. Operators shall provide the commission
320 with a list of players who have elected to be excluded from
321 video lottery game play within thirty days of such election
322 and shall update such list periodically as required by the
323 commission. Such list shall be a closed record under
324 chapter 610 and shall not be released to the public. The
325 commission shall issue such self-exclusion procedures by
326 rule.
327 (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
328 contrary, a video lottery game operator may establish a
329 player rewards system, which shall be approved by the
330 commission. No player shall be required to enroll in a
331 rewards program offered by a video lottery game operator as
332 a condition to play video lottery games.
333 10. No licensed video lottery game operator shall:

SB 941 22
334 (1) Offer video lottery game terminals that directly
335 dispense anything of value except for video lottery game
336 tickets. Tickets shall be dispensed by pressing the ticket
337 dispensing button on the video lottery game terminal at the
338 end of any video lottery game play. The ticket shall
339 indicate the total amount of video lottery game terminal
340 credits and the cash award, the time of day in a twenty-four-
341 hour format showing hours and minutes, the date, the
342 terminal serial number, the sequential number of the ticket,
343 and an encrypted validation number from which the validity
344 of the prize may be determined. The price of video lottery
345 game terminal credits shall be determined by the
346 commission. The maximum wager played per video lottery game
347 for a single video lottery game play shall not exceed four
348 dollars. The maximum prize for a single video lottery game
349 play shall be no more than one dollar less than the minimum
350 amount required to report gambling winnings from slot
351 machines pursuant to IRS Form W2G and IRS Form 5754;
352 (2) Operate more than eight video lottery game
353 terminals per location on the premises that maintains a
354 video lottery game retailer's license;
355 (3) Advertise to the public through any means
356 including, but not limited to, media outlets, direct mail,
357 telephone solicitation, billboards, or other signage. The
358 advertising prohibition contained in this subdivision shall
359 apply to all licensees including, but not limited to, video
360 lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game distributors,
361 video lottery game operators, video lottery game retailers,
362 and video lottery game handlers. Notwithstanding any other
363 provision of law to the contrary, there is no prohibition or
364 restriction on direct or indirect marketing or advertising
365 between video lottery game manufacturers, video lottery game

SB 941 23
366 distributors, video lottery game operators, video lottery
367 game retailers, and video lottery game handlers such as in
368 trade journals or at trade conferences, and video lottery
369 game terminal operators may advertise, promote, and market
370 to players of video gaming terminals through player rewards
371 programs approved by the commission; or
372 (4) Allow video lottery games to be played at any time
373 when the video lottery game retailer's establishment is
374 closed for business.
375 11. (1) No person under twenty-one years of age shall
376 play video lottery games. The video lottery game retailer
377 shall be responsible for preventing persons under twenty-one
378 years of age from playing video lottery games.
379 (2) Video lottery game operators shall have a video
380 surveillance system within the immediate area of the video
381 lottery game retailer's establishment where video lottery
382 game terminals are located. The video lottery game retailer
383 shall maintain video footage for thirty days and shall, upon
384 request, provide such footage to the video lottery game
385 operator with which a video lottery game retailer has an
386 agreement or to the commission. Video footage taken by the
387 video surveillance system shall:
388 (a) Be deleted and expunged after the thirty day
389 period described in this subdivision; and
390 (b) Not make use of any facial recognition technology
391 or software.
392 (3) A video lottery game operator or video lottery
393 game retailer that fails to report any known violation of
394 law, rule, or regulation governing the conduct of video
395 lottery games in conformance with established commission
396 procedures may be subject to an administrative fine not to
397 exceed five thousand dollars. In the event a video lottery

SB 941 24
398 game operator or retailer is found to have knowingly
399 committed a violation of law, rule, or regulation governing
400 the conduct of video lottery games, the commission may
401 impose an administrative fine not to exceed five thousand
402 dollars, suspend such video lottery game operator's or
403 retailer's license for up to thirty days or, in the case of
404 repeated violations, revoke such operator's or retailer's
405 license for a period of one year.
406 (4) A video lottery game operator shall post a sign in
407 a conspicuous location where such video lottery game
408 terminals are located containing, in red lettering at least
409 one-half inch high on a white background, a telephone
410 contact number (1-888-BETSOFF) for the problem gambling
411 helpline.
412 (5) Pursuant to rules adopted by the commission, a
413 video lottery game operator shall be responsible for:
414 (a) Payments to winning players;
415 (b) Collecting all funds from video lottery game
416 terminals;
417 (c) Depositing all funds so collected into a separate
418 bank account maintained by the video lottery terminal
419 operator to allow for electronic fund transfers by the
420 commission on a monthly basis all applicable adjusted gross
421 gaming tax; and
422 (d) After such transfer by the commission, remitting
423 to the video lottery game retailer its share of net terminal
424 income on not less than a monthly basis. The video lottery
425 game operator may thereafter transfer its share of net
426 terminal income to its business operations account.
427 (6) A video lottery game retailer or operator shall
428 place a conspicuous warning label or sticker on each gaming
429 machine at each retail location in red lettering at least

SB 941 25
430 one-half inch high on a white background that reads,
431 "WARNING: GAMBLING CAN BE ADDICTIVE".
432 12. The adjusted gross gaming revenue tax shall be
433 imposed on adjusted gross gaming revenue. Video lottery
434 terminal operators shall collect and remit the adjusted
435 gross gaming revenue tax, which shall be deposited in the
436 state lottery fund pursuant to rules adopted by the
437 commission. The commission shall use and transmit such
438 funds as follows:
439 (1) The commission shall retain an amount necessary to
440 cover any administrative expenses that are not covered by
441 reimbursements from video lottery game operators, less the
442 amount to be distributed pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
443 section, which shall not be considered state revenues and
444 such funds shall not be deposited into the state lottery
445 fund;
446 (2) The commission shall adopt rules to identify the
447 location, by city and county, of each video lottery terminal
448 being operated in the state and connected to the central
449 control system. Such city or county so identified shall
450 receive ten percent of the gross gaming revenue tax
451 collected and remitted on the adjusted gross gaming revenue
452 generated by those video lottery terminals located within
453 the jurisdiction of such identified city or county for use
454 in providing services necessary for the safety of the public
455 visiting a video lottery terminal retailer's location. All
456 revenue owed to such city or county shall be deposited and
457 distributed to such city or county in accordance with rules
458 adopted by the commission. Any such revenues distributed to
459 the governing bodies of any city or county shall not be
460 considered state funds and shall be deposited in such city

SB 941 26
461 or county's general revenue fund to be expended as provided
462 for in this section;
463 (3) All remaining funds not allocated for
464 administrative expenses or not designated as state revenue
465 pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection shall be
466 deposited in the state lottery fund and transferred by
467 appropriation to the lottery proceeds fund and shall be
468 appropriated equally to public elementary and secondary
469 education and public institutions of higher learning with an
470 emphasis on funding elementary and secondary education
471 student transportation costs and public institutions of
472 higher education workforce development programs. The
473 funding provided for in this subdivision shall supplement,
474 and not supplant, any education funding otherwise
475 appropriated by the general assembly.
476 13. All revenues received by the commission from
477 license fees and any reimbursements associated with the
478 administration of the provisions of sections 313.425 to
479 313.437, and all interest earned thereon, shall be
480 considered administrative expenses and shall be deposited in
481 the state lottery fund. Moneys deposited into the state
482 lottery fund from license fees and any reimbursements of
483 commission administrative expenses to administer sections
484 313.425 to 313.437 shall be considered administrative
485 expenses and shall not be considered net proceeds under
486 Article III, Section 39(b) of the Constitution of Missouri.
487 Subject to appropriation, up to one percent of such license
488 fees shall be deposited to the credit of the compulsive
489 gamblers fund created under section 313.842. The remainder
490 of the moneys deposited in the state lottery fund from video
491 lottery game license fees and any reimbursements of
492 commission administrative expenses to enforce sections

SB 941 27
493 313.425 to 313.437 shall be used for administrative expenses
494 associated with supervising and enforcing the provisions of
495 sections 313.425 to 313.437.
496 14. The commission shall contract with a state law
497 enforcement entity to assist in conducting background
498 investigations of video lottery game license applicants, and
499 for the enforcement of sections 313.425 to 313.437.
500 15. A video lottery game licensee found to have
501 violated sections 313.425 to 313.437 may appeal such finding
502 directly to a circuit court of competent jurisdiction.
503 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
504 there is no requirement to exhaust any administrative
505 remedies.
506 16. The commission shall adopt rules for the
507 implementation of the video lottery game system authorized
508 under sections 313.425 to 313.437 including, but not limited
509 to, a reasonable designation of an area within a video
510 lottery game retailer's premises as the gaming area that is
511 distinct and divided from the primary business operation
512 area of the retailers establishment where all video lottery
513 terminals and ancillary equipment shall be placed and
514 operated and all gaming activity shall be conducted. Any
515 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
516 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
517 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
518 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
519 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
520 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
521 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
522 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
523 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,

SB 941 28
524 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
525 or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
313.431. In order to expedite the orderly
implementation of the video lottery game system authorized
under sections 313.425 to 313.437, the commission shall:
(1) Contract for the supply and operation of a
centralized computer system for video lottery games no later
than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of
sections 313.425 to 313.437;
(2) Make license applications for video lottery game
manufacturers, video lottery game distributors, video
lottery game operators, video lottery game retailers, and
video lottery game handlers available to applicants and
accept such applications and promulgate any emergency or
regular rules and regulations needed for the implementation
of the video lottery game system authorized under sections
313.425 to 313.437 no later than one hundred eighty days
after the effective date of sections 313.425 to 313.437;
(3) Issue an approved form for persons applying for a
video lottery game terminal operator's license available for
use in contracting with a video lottery game retailer no
later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date
of sections 313.425 to 313.437;
(4) Establish a start date for when all initial video
lottery game operator licensees may begin soliciting
contracts with video lottery game retailers for the
placement of video lottery game terminals. No licensee
shall be allowed to solicit contracts prior to the
established start date. Such start date shall be set no
more than one hundred eighty days after the last video
lottery game operator's application received in the first

SB 941 29
year after the implementation of sections 313.425 to 313.437
is approved by the commission;
(5) Approve or deny any completed video lottery game
retailer application or video lottery game operator
application no more than ninety days after such application
is received. For all such applications received in the
first year after the implementation of sections 313.425 to
313.437, applications shall be approved or denied at least
thirty days prior to the start date established in
subdivision (4) of this subsection. The operating of a no-
chance game shall not be cause for denial of a VLT
operator's or retailer's license; and
(6) Establish a date by which the system of video
lottery game terminals shall be operational. The
operational date shall be set no more than one hundred
eighty days after the start date established in subdivision
(4) of this subsection.
313.433. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, participation by a person, firm, corporation,
or organization in any aspect of the state lottery under
sections 313.425 to 313.437 shall not be construed to be a
lottery or gift enterprise in violation of Article III,
Section 39 of the Constitution of Missouri.
313.434. 1. The state of Missouri shall be exempt
from the provisions of 15 U.S.C. Section 1172, as amended.
2. All shipments of gaming devices used to conduct
video lottery games authorized under sections 313.425 to
313.437 to licensees, the registering, recording, and
labeling of which have been completed by the manufacturer or
distributor thereof in accordance with 15 U.S.C. Sections
1171 to 1178, as amended, shall be legal shipments of
gambling devices into this state.

SB 941 30
313.435. 1. A municipality may adopt an ordinance
permitting video lottery game terminals within the corporate
limits of such municipality within one hundred eighty days
from the effective date of this act. Such municipality
shall notify the commission of the ordinance within seven
days of passage. A municipality that has adopted such an
ordinance may at any time thereafter adopt an ordinance
prohibiting video lottery game terminals within the
corporate limits of such municipality.
2. A county commission may, for the unincorporated
area of the county, adopt an ordinance permitting video
lottery game terminals within the unincorporated area of the
county within one hundred eighty days from the effective
date of this act. Such county shall notify the commission
of the ordinance within seven days of passage. A county
commission that has adopted such an ordinance may at any
time thereafter adopt an ordinance prohibiting video lottery
game terminals within the unincorporated area of the county.
3. Any municipality or county adopting an ordinance
that prohibits the licensing of video lottery games shall
notify the commission of such action and provide a certified
copy of such ordinance to the commission. Upon receiving
such notification and ordinance, the commission shall not
license video lottery game retailers within such area
covered by such municipal or county ordinance.
4. If any such municipality or county that has opted
to prohibit the use of video lottery game terminals to play
video lottery games repeals such ordinance, the municipality
or county shall notify the commission, and upon notification
of the repeal, the commission may license video lottery game
retailers within such municipality or county to conduct
video lottery games.

SB 941 31
313.437. Nothing in sections 313.425 to 313.437 shall
be construed to prohibit or bar the issuance of any license
described therein to an applicant on the basis of that
applicant's operation, handling, leasing, licensing,
servicing, or placing of machines or devices used for
amusement purposes, except that any video lottery game
retailer shall attest, on a form provided by the commission,
that the video lottery game retailer does not have any
machines or devices operating in the retail establishment
where winning game plays result in a cash payout. This form
shall be submitted no later than forty-eight hours after the
placement and operation of any video lottery game terminals
in the retail establishment.
313.820. 1. An excursion boat licensee shall pay to
the commission an admission fee of [two] four dollars for
each person embarking on an excursion gambling boat with a
ticket of admission. One dollar of such fee shall be
deposited to the credit of the gaming commission fund as
authorized pursuant to section 313.835, two dollars of such
fee shall be transferred to the Missouri veterans commission
as established under section 42.007, and one dollar of such
fee shall not be considered state funds and shall be paid to
the home dock city or county. Subject to appropriation, one
cent of such fee deposited to the credit of the gaming
commission fund may be deposited to the credit of the
compulsive gamblers fund created pursuant to the provisions
of section 313.842. Nothing in this section shall preclude
any licensee from charging any amount deemed necessary for a
ticket of admission to any person embarking on an excursion
gambling boat. If tickets are issued which are good for
more than one excursion, the admission fee shall be paid to
the commission for each person using the ticket on each

SB 941 32
excursion that the ticket is used. If free passes or
complimentary admission tickets are issued, the excursion
boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same fee upon
these passes or complimentary tickets as if they were sold
at the regular and usual admission rate; however, the
excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to actual
and necessary officials and employees of the licensee or
other persons actually working on the excursion gambling
boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the
rules of the commission, and a list of all persons to whom
the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with the
commission.
2. All licensees are subject to all income taxes,
sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes, property taxes or
any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any
political subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit
tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes or fees shall
be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by
a political subdivision. All state taxes not connected
directly to gambling games shall be collected by the
department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 32.057 to the contrary, the department of revenue
may furnish and the commission may receive tax information
to determine if applicants or licensees are complying with
the tax laws of this state; however, any tax information
acquired by the commission shall not become public record
and shall be used exclusively for commission business.
572.010. As used in this chapter the following terms
mean:
(1) "Advance gambling activity", a person advances
gambling activity if, acting other than as a player, he or
she engages in conduct that materially aids any form of

SB 941 33
gambling activity. Conduct of this nature includes but is
not limited to conduct directed toward the creation or
establishment of the particular game, lottery, contest,
scheme, gambling device, device or activity involved, toward
the acquisition or maintenance of premises, paraphernalia,
equipment or apparatus therefor, toward the solicitation or
inducement of persons to participate therein, toward the
actual conduct of the playing phases thereof, toward the
arrangement or communication of any of its financial or
recording phases, or toward any other phase of its
operation. A person advances gambling activity if, having
substantial proprietary control or other authoritative
control over premises being used with his or her knowledge
for purposes of gambling activity, he or she permits that
activity to occur or continue or makes no effort to prevent
its occurrence or continuation. The supplying, servicing
and operation of a licensed excursion gambling boat under
sections 313.800 to 313.840 does not constitute advancing
gambling activity;
(2) "Bookmaking", advancing gambling activity by
unlawfully accepting bets from members of the public as a
business, rather than in a casual or personal fashion, upon
the outcomes of future contingent events;
(3) "Contest of chance", any contest, game, gaming
scheme or gaming device in which the outcome depends in a
material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding
that the skill of the contestants may also be a factor
therein;
(4) "Gambling", a person engages in gambling when he
or she stakes or risks something of value upon the outcome
of a contest of chance or a future contingent event not
under his or her control or influence, upon an agreement or

SB 941 34
understanding that he or she will receive something of value
in the event of a certain outcome.
Gambling does not include bona fide business transactions
valid under the law of contracts, including but not limited
to contracts for the purchase or sale at a future date of
securities or commodities, and agreements to compensate for
loss caused by the happening of chance, including but not
limited to contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life,
health or accident insurance; nor does gambling include
playing an amusement device that confers only an immediate
right of replay not exchangeable for something of value.
Gambling does not include any licensed activity, or persons
participating in such games which are covered by sections
313.800 to 313.840;
(5) "Gambling device", any device, machine,
paraphernalia or equipment that is used or usable in the
playing phases of any gambling activity, whether that
activity consists of gambling between persons or gambling by
a person with a machine. However, lottery tickets, policy
slips and other items used in the playing phases of lottery
and policy schemes are not gambling devices within this
definition;
(6) "Gambling record", any article, instrument,
record, receipt, ticket, certificate, token, slip or
notation used or intended to be used in connection with
unlawful gambling activity;
(7) "Lottery" or "policy", an unlawful gambling scheme
in which for a consideration the participants are given an
opportunity to win something of value, the award of which is
determined by chance;

SB 941 35
(8) "Player", a person who engages in any form of
gambling solely as a contestant or bettor, without receiving
or becoming entitled to receive any profit therefrom other
than personal gambling winnings, and without otherwise
rendering any material assistance to the establishment,
conduct or operation of the particular gambling activity. A
person who gambles at a social game of chance on equal terms
with the other participants therein does not otherwise
render material assistance to the establishment, conduct or
operation thereof by performing, without fee or
remuneration, acts directed toward the arrangement or
facilitation of the game, such as inviting persons to play,
permitting the use of premises therefor and supplying cards
or other equipment used therein. A person who engages in
"bookmaking" as defined in subdivision (2) of this section
is not a player;
(9) "Professional player", a player who engages in
gambling for a livelihood or who has derived at least twenty
percent of his or her income in any one year within the past
five years from acting solely as a player;
(10) "Profit from gambling activity", a person profits
from gambling activity if, other than as a player, he or she
accepts or receives money or other property pursuant to an
agreement or understanding with any person whereby he
participates or is to participate in the proceeds of
gambling activity;
(11) "Slot machine", a gambling device that as a
result of the insertion of a coin or other object operates,
either completely automatically or with the aid of some
physical act by the player, in such a manner that, depending
upon elements of chance, it may eject something of value. A
device so constructed or readily adaptable or convertible to

SB 941 36
100 such use is no less a slot machine because it is not in
101 working order or because some mechanical act of manipulation
102 or repair is required to accomplish its adaptation,
103 conversion or workability. Nor is it any less a slot
104 machine because apart from its use or adaptability as such
105 it may also sell or deliver something of value on a basis
106 other than chance;
107 (12) "Something of value", any money or property, any
108 token, object or article exchangeable for money or property,
109 or any form of credit or promise directly or indirectly
110 contemplating transfer of money or property or of any
111 interest therein or involving extension of a service,
112 entertainment or a privilege of playing at a game or scheme
113 without charge;
114 (13) "Unlawful", not specifically authorized by law.
572.015. Nothing in this chapter prohibits
constitutionally authorized activities under Article III,
Sections 39(a) to 39(f) of the Missouri Constitution,
including a raffle that uses tickets, devices, or machines
in which a person buys game chances from a finite number of
raffle draws for a prize, provided that it can be proven
through the opinion of a qualified engineer from an
independent testing laboratory accredited under ISO standard
17025 that the determination of the winner of the raffle
using an electronic device or machine was the result of
draws of numbered tickets in electronic form, from a finite
deal thereof.
572.100. 1. The general assembly by enacting this
chapter intends to preempt any other regulation of the area
covered by this chapter. No governmental subdivision or
agency may enact or enforce a law that regulates or makes
any conduct in the area covered by this chapter an offense,

SB 941 37
or the subject of a criminal or civil penalty or sanction of
any kind.
2. The term "gambling", as used in this chapter, does
not include licensed activities under sections 313.800 to
313.840, and does not include licensed activities under
sections 313.425 to 313.437.
650.930. 1. There is hereby established within the
department of public safety the "Missouri Gaming Bureau".
The Missouri gaming commission and the Missouri lottery
commission may contract with the Missouri gaming bureau for
assistance in criminal and regulatory investigations
involving individuals, companies, and suppliers who are
applying for licensure or who are conducting any activities
under sections 313.800 to 313.850 or operations relating to
video lottery games.
2. The director of the gaming bureau shall be a
uniformed member of the Missouri state highway patrol who
shall be appointed by the superintendent of the state
highway patrol. The director shall be responsible for the
administrative operations of the gaming bureau and shall
perform such other duties as may be delegated or assigned to
the director by the department of public safety. Members of
the state highway patrol, pursuant to a memorandum of
understanding with the state highway patrol, may provide
services to the gaming bureau. The director may employ
additional members to serve in the gaming bureau, provided
that such persons are licensed peace officers under chapter
590 and have a minimum of six hundred hours of law
enforcement training.
3. Members of the gaming bureau shall have full power
and authority as are now or hereafter vested by law in peace
officers when working with the bureau which shall include

SB 941 38
the power to enforce the rules of the gaming commission with
respect to the gaming and lottery industry and the power to
investigate violations occurring on the gaming floor and
premises of casinos licensed under sections 313.800 to
313.850, violations by licensees of the lottery commission,
and violations of chapter 572.
4. Members of the gaming bureau shall be paid from
funds designated as administrative within the state lottery
fund established under section 313.321 that were generated
from revenues received by the Missouri lottery commission
from the sale of Missouri lottery tickets and from license
fees and reimbursements associated with the regulation and
operation of video lottery games in the state and from funds
designated as administrative within the gaming commission
fund established under section 313.835 that were generated
from revenues received by the Missouri gaming commission
from license fees and reimbursements associated with the
regulation and operation of excursion gambling boats in the
state.
5. The director of the department of public safety may
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

SB 941 39
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓